tests/verbs-pii.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "{A}р":
    бар<v><iv><pii><p1><sg> : барарым
    бар<v><iv><pii><p2><sg> : барарыҥ
    бар<v><iv><pii><p3><sg> : барара
    бар<v><iv><pii><p1><pl> : барарбыт
    бар<v><iv><pii><p2><pl> : бараргыт
    бар<v><iv><pii><p3><pl> : бараллара
